Ohio, session 136, SB247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.05 be amended and section 5.083 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.05. The tree, Aesculus globra glabra, commonly known as the "Buckeye" is hereby adopted as the official tree of the state. Sec. 5.083. The confection consisting of peanut butter fudge and chocolate, known as the buckeye, is hereby adopted as the official candy of the state. Section 2. That existing section 5.05 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.